Wyoming, session 2026, HB0142.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-3-402 is created to read:

ARTICLE 4
LITERACY SCREENING ASSESSMENT AND INTERVENTION

21-3-402. Literacy screening assessment and
intervention.

(a) As used in this section, "reading difficulties"
means conditions or patterns that interfere with the
development of accurate and fluent word recognition,
spelling or comprehension, including but not limited to
dyslexia and developmental language disorder, as
demonstrated by a student's performance on literacy
screening assessments.

(b) Each school district shall implement literacy
screening assessments and multi-tiered system of support
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287
literacy programming that shall include literacy screening
assessments, evidence based intervention programming and
evidence based core literacy instruction for grades
kindergarten through five (5). Each school district shall
select and implement literacy screening assessments that
use one (1) or more instruments identified by the state
superintendent under subsection (g) of this section that
identify students at-risk for reading difficulties. The
literacy screening assessments shall be administered three
(3) times per year to all students in kindergarten through
grade three (3) and students in grades four (4) and five
(5) who scored below the proficient standard in English
language arts on the statewide assessment administered
under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v) during the previous school year.

(c) As soon as practicable after the applicable
literacy screening assessment administration period has
concluded under subsection (b) of this section, each school
district shall provide a copy of the literacy screening
assessments results, including an explanation of the
results, to the parent, guardian or other person having
control of a student whose composite score on the literacy
screening assessments indicates high risk for reading
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287
difficulties. Students identified to be at the highest risk
level for reading difficulties on literacy screening
assessments under this section shall be placed in the most
intensive level of the school district's evidence based
intervention programming with an individualized reading
plan anytime between the middle of the school year in
kindergarten through the end of grade five (5), only if the
student's parent or guardian provides written consent. If a
student's parent or guardian does not provide written
consent under this subsection then the student may receive
classroom based skill-specific evidence based literacy
instructional supports during intervention or enrichment
times. Each school district shall maintain individual
reading plan records of all evidence based interventions
implemented for each student identified as at-risk for
reading difficulties, including but not limited to,
progress monitoring data. Literacy interventions shall not
occur during literacy core instructional time. For students
under an individualized education plan (IEP) or English
language learning plan (ELP) that addresses reading
difficulties, the IEP or ELP shall be deemed sufficient to
meet the requirements of this subsection and no additional
documentation shall be required.
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287

(d) Each school district shall implement multi-tiered
evidence based intervention programming that shall provide
skill-specific evidence based interventions for students
identified by the literacy screening assessments or
additional literacy diagnostic assessments as at-risk for
reading difficulties.

(e) Each school district shall implement evidence
based core literacy instruction to all students. The
evidence based core literacy instruction implemented under
this subsection shall include instructional opportunities
for:

(i) Grades kindergarten through three (3) in
phonological or phonemic awareness;

(ii) Grades kindergarten through five (5) in:

(A) Decoding and encoding;

(B) Reading comprehension;

HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287
(C) Language comprehension, including
vocabulary; and

(D) Written expression.

(iii) Grades one (1) through five (5) in oral
reading fluency.

(f) Not later than June 30, 2026 and each June 30
thereafter, each school district shall annually report to
the department of education on the progress of each of its
schools toward achieving the goal of eighty percent (80%)
of all students in grades kindergarten through three (3)
scoring low risk for reading difficulties as determined by
the end of the school year literacy screening assessments.
This report shall also include grade level data for
kindergarten through grade five (5) for those students
identified as high risk for reading difficulties by the
literacy screening assessments. The report shall include a
list of the evidence based core literacy instruction and
intervention programming resources implemented in each
grade level. Each school not meeting the eighty percent
(80%) goal specified under this subsection or not showing
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287
improvement the past three (3) years toward meeting the
eighty percent (80%) goal shall submit an improvement plan
to the school district, and the school district shall
submit an overall improvement plan for that school to the
department not later than November 15, 2026 and each
November 15 thereafter. At a minimum, each school district
improvement plan for each school not meeting the eighty
percent (80%) goal shall outline its evidence based
strategies for increasing literacy proficiency for the next
school year and shall specifically address the changes in
evidence based instruction, intervention or professional
development. Each school district that is required to
submit a school improvement plan to the department under
this subsection may combine any literacy requirements under
this subsection with the improvement plan submitted under
W.S. 21-2-204(h)(v).

(g) The state superintendent, in consultation with
Wyoming school districts, professionals in the area of
literacy and administration and other stakeholders, shall
promulgate rules to assist school districts in the
selection of literacy screening assessments to assess the
skills in paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection. Based
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287
on the criteria incorporated by rule, the state
superintendent shall identify literacy screening assessment
instruments and recommended diagnostic assessments that are
approved for use by school districts to provide data that
informs identification and intervention of students at-risk
for reading difficulties as required under subsection (b)
of this section. The rules shall provide mechanisms for the
state superintendent to support schools and school
districts in meeting the goals of school improvement plans
developed pursuant to subsection (f) of this section. The
rules shall establish procedures for the state
superintendent to impose corrective action on any school
district that for three (3) consecutive years after being
placed on a school improvement plan has failed to show
improvement toward meeting the eighty percent (80%) goal of
all students scoring low risk for reading difficulties
pursuant to subsection (f) of this section. To accomplish
the purposes of this subsection, the department of
education shall collect kindergarten through grade five (5)
statewide longitudinal data from literacy screening
assessments selected and performed by each school district,
which measures the risk levels in the following areas of
literacy in:
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287

(i) Grades kindergarten through five (5) in:

(A) Decoding and encoding;

(B) Oral reading fluency;

(C) Reading comprehension; and

(D) Language comprehension, including
vocabulary.

(ii) Grades kindergarten through two (2) in
phonological or phonemic awareness.

(h) Commencing with school year 2026-2027, each
school district shall require each district employee who
holds an elementary education endorsement, an early
childhood education endorsement, an exceptional generalist
endorsement or exceptional specialist endorsement, who
provides instruction in grades kindergarten through five
(5) within the district and who does not hold a Wyoming
structured literacy certificate endorsement, dyslexia
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287
specialist endorsement or a reading endorsement to receive
not less than fourteen (14) hours of professional
development annually in evidence based literacy
instruction, intervention and assessment until the district
employee obtains a Wyoming structured literacy certificate
endorsement, a dyslexia specialist endorsement or a reading
endorsement. Commencing with school year 2026-2027 and
every three (3) years thereafter, each school district
shall require each school district employee that provides
or supports instruction in grades kindergarten through five
(5) within the district or who holds a Wyoming structured
literacy certificate endorsement, a dyslexia specialist
endorsement or a reading endorsement to receive not less
than three and one-half (3.5) hours of professional
development in evidence based literacy instruction. The
rules required under subsection (g) of this section shall
contain criteria recommendations identifying appropriate
and suitable professional development for district
employees in evidence based literacy instruction.

(j) Commencing with school year 2029-2030, each
school district shall employ or consult with not less than
one (1) person who holds a Wyoming structured literacy
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287
certificate endorsement, a dyslexia specialist endorsement
or a reading endorsement to support school district
literacy professional development.

Section 2. W.S. 21-2-802(a) by creating a new
paragraph (iv) and 21-3-110(a)(xxiii) are amended to read:

21-2-802. Powers and duties; teacher certification;
suspension and revocation; certification fees; disposition
of collected fees; required data submissions to department
of education.

(a) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations:

(iv) Not later than school year 2027-2028,
establish a structured literacy certificate endorsement and
a dyslexia specialist endorsement for grades kindergarten
through twelve (12).

21-3-110. Duties of boards of trustees.

(a) The board of trustees in each school district
shall:
HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287

(xxiii) Implement and administer the reading
literacy screening assessment and intervention program
multi-tiered system of support literacy programming for
students in kindergarten through grade three (3) five (5)
as required by W.S. 21-3-401 21-3-402;

Section 3. W.S. 21-3-401 is repealed.

Section 4. This act shall apply to school year
2026-2027 and each school year thereafter.

Section 5. The department of education and the
Wyoming professional teaching standards board shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0142

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0287
Section 6.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(b) Sections 5 and 6 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0142